Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-1501
Act, how cited.

Sections 50-1501 to 50-1520 shall be known and may be cited as the Legislative Qualifications and Election Contests Act.

Laws 2018, LB744, § 8.